North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57B. Health Maintenance Organization Act.
§§ 57B-1 through 57B-25.
[Repealed]

Recodified as Article 67 of Chapter 58.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter has been recodified as Article 67 of Chapter 58, under the authority of Session Laws 1987, c. 752, s. 9 and Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 34.

For old to new section correlations, see the table of disposition provided at the end of Chapter 58.